Idaho statutes. Title 37 FOOD, DRUGS, AND OIL
Chapter 7
PASTEURIZATION OF MARKET MILK AND MARKET MILK PRODUCTS

Sec.

§ 37-701. Statement of purpose. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2014, ch. 284, § 2, effective July 1, 2014.

§ 37-702. Definitions. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2014, ch. 284, § 2, effective July 1, 2014.

§ 37-703. Director of department of agriculture to enforce. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2014, ch. 284, § 2, effective July 1, 2014.

§ 37-704. Department of Public Health to issue certificates of compliance. [Repealed.]

§ 37-705. Certificate to be renewed annually. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2014, ch. 284, § 2, effective July 1, 2014.

§ 37-706. Certificate necessary for labeling as pasteurized. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2014, ch. 284, § 2, effective July 1, 2014.

§ 37-707. Standards for equipment and sanitation. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2014, ch. 284, § 2, effective July 1, 2014.

§ 37-708. Rules, regulations and standards to be prescribed. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2014, ch. 284, § 2, effective July 1, 2014.

§ 37-709. Penalty for violations. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2014, ch. 284, § 2, effective July 1, 2014.

§ 37-710. Injunctions against violations. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2014, ch. 284, § 2, effective July 1, 2014.

§ 37-711. Separability. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2014, ch. 284, § 2, effective July 1, 2014.